test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-Clex_jiavtas_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjective - jiävtáš: # MLO, ok
    jiävtáš+A+Sg+Nom: jiävtáš             
    jiävtáš+A+Sg+Gen: jiävttáá
    jiävtáš+A+Sg+Acc: jiävttáá
    jiävtáš+A+Sg+Ill: jiävtážân
    jiävtáš+A+Sg+Loc: jiävttáást
    jiävtáš+A+Sg+Com: jiävttáin
    jiävtáš+A+Sg+Abe: jiävttááttáá
    jiävtáš+A+Ess: jiävtážin                
    jiävtáš+A+Par: jiävtážid                
    jiävtáš+A+Pl+Nom: jiävttááh
    jiävtáš+A+Pl+Gen: jiävttái
    jiävtáš+A+Pl+Acc: jiävttáid
    jiävtáš+A+Pl+Ill: jiävttáid
    jiävtáš+A+Pl+Loc: jiävttáin
    jiävtáš+A+Pl+Com: [jiävttáiguin, jiävttáigijn]
    jiävtáš+A+Pl+Abe: jiävttáittáá
